California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
A marketing order may contain provisions for the establishment of surplus, stabilization, or byproduct pools for any commodity, or of any grade, size, quality, or condition of it, and providing for the sale of the commodity in any such pool and for the equitable distribution among the persons that are participating in the pool of the net returns which are derived from the sale of such commodity. The marketing of green ripe olives is not, however, subject to any provisions of a marketing order which relate to the establishment and operation of surplus pools.

If the marketing order authorizes the establishment of any such pool, the advisory board may receive such commodity from each producer or handler and handle it according to the grade, size, quality, or condition of the commodity and account to each producer or handler that is participating in the pool upon a pro rata basis for the net proceeds derived from the sale of the commodity.

The contents of any surplus pool shall not be marketed by the advisory board in any form which would compete directly with that portion of the commodity which is marketed in regular channels of trade. However, any portion of any surplus pool may be transferred by the advisory board upon any gratuitous basis to charitable organizations and other similar agencies under proper safeguards to insure that none of such commodity shall compete directly with the unrestricted portion of such commodity.

The advisory board may dispose of the contents of a stabilization pool in the regular marketing channels in such manner and at such times as it deems advisable, consistent with the maintenance of stabilized marketing conditions for such commodity. The advisory board may dispose of the contents of any byproduct pool only for byproducts or for other similar purposes under proper safeguards to prevent such portion of the commodity so disposed of from directly competing with that part of the commodity which is marketed in the usual form or in the regular channels of trade.

If the marketing order authorizes the establishment of a surplus, stabilization, or byproduct pool, the advisory board may do any of the following:

(a) Arrange for and operate any necessary facilities for the storing, financing, grading, packing, servicing, processing, preparing for market, selling, and disposing of the contents of any pools which are provided for in this chapter. The board shall not, however, engage in commercial warehousing.

(b) Pledge all of the commodity in any such pools with banks or other lending agencies for the purpose of obtaining loans upon it. The board shall have title, for the purpose of financing and handling, to all of the commodity in any such pools.

(c) Create, by a uniform assessment upon producers, or upon some other uniform and equitable basis, maintain, and disburse an equalization fund to be used for the removal of any inequalities between producers or handlers that are participating in any pool which result from errors in estimating production or surplus or for indemnifying producers whose production, in whole or in part, is diverted in green form or otherwise from normal marketing outlets or diverted to byproducts, relief, or other noncompetitive purposes pursuant to the provisions of the marketing order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58888.

A marketing order may contain provisions which establish, or provide for the establishment, with respect to any commodity, either as delivered by producers to handlers or processors, or as handled, processed, or otherwise prepared for market, or as marketed by producers, handlers, or processors, both of the following:

(a) Grading standards of quality, condition, size, maturity, or pack, which standards may include minimum standards. The standards so established shall not, however, be established below any minimum standards which are prescribed by law for such commodity.

(b) Uniform inspection and grading of such commodity in accordance with the standards which are so established.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58889.

(a) A marketing order may contain provisions for the establishment of plans for advertising and sales promotion to maintain present markets or to create new or larger markets for any commodity that is grown in this state, or for the prevention, modification, or removal of trade barriers that obstruct the free flow of any commodity to market. The secretary may prepare, issue, administer, and enforce plans for promoting the sale of any commodity.

(b) Any plan shall be directed toward increasing the sale of the commodity without reference to any private brand or trade name that is used by any handler with respect to the commodity regulated by the marketing order, except the use of wine if other than private brands or private trade names are unavailable, and except that marketing orders that provide for the advertising and sales promotion of raisins, prunes, and walnuts may allow those plans to credit the pro rata assessment obligations of a handler with all or any portion of that handler’s direct expenditures for the marketing promotion that may include private brand or trade name advertising performance allowances, sales promotions, couponing, and in-store promotion programs and materials.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, any marketing order for fluid milk may contain in its advertising and sales promotion plan provisions to allocate funds for promotions of cheese, ice cream, or butter products made with California milk, including promotions in which brand or trade names are used, but only if the use is incidental to the promotion of the California milk product and not in direct promotion of the brand or trade name, and if the allocation of funds is made available on a nondiscriminatory basis to all retailers and manufacturers of butter, ice cream, or cheese utilizing milk produced in California. Permissible private brand or trade name marketing promotions may include advertising, performance allowances, sales promotions, couponing subject to Section 61375 and in-store promotion programs and materials, and other marketing communication tools.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “butter” means the product made by gathering the fat of fresh or ripened milk or cream into a mass, which also contains a small portion of other milk constituents.

(3) This subdivision shall not become operative unless approved as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 58993.

(d) No advertising or sales promotion program shall be issued by the secretary that makes use of false or unwarranted claims in behalf of any product, or disparages the quality, value, sale, or use of any other commodity.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 912, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2002, Ch. 157, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

58889.1.

Notwithstanding Section 58889, any marketing order for processed fruits, nuts, or vegetables may contain in its advertising and sales promotion plan provisions to allocate funds to promote private brands or trade names.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 809, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

58889.3.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 58889, effective immediately, a marketing order may contain provisions for the establishment of plans for advertising and sales promotion, including any private brand or trade name, to maintain present international foreign markets or to create new or larger international foreign markets for any commodity which is grown in this state, provided that effective January 1, 1978, such advertising and sales promotion plans require that each individual commodity package label indicate the commodity is of California origin in English or other appropriate language.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 309.)
-------------------------------------------

58890.

A marketing order may contain provisions which relate to the prohibition of unfair trade practices. In addition to the unfair trade practices now prohibited by law, applicable to the processing, distribution, or handling of any commodity within this state, the director may include in any marketing order which is issued provisions that are designed to correct any trade practice which affects the processing, distributing, or handling of any commodity within this state which the director finds, after a hearing upon the marketing order in which all interested persons are given an opportunity to be heard, is unfair and detrimental to the effectuation of the declared purposes of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58891.

A marketing order may contain provisions for the application for, review, certification, and equitable payment of, production adjustment benefits to growers from funds which are collected for such purpose on a uniform basis from all commercial growers of any commodity in the state, for which production adjustment payments are made. Such funds may be supplemented by funds, if any, which are received from federal, state, or other agencies for such purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

58892.

(a) A marketing order may contain provisions for carrying on research studies in the production, processing, or distribution of any commodity and for the expenditure of moneys for these purposes. Prior to the implementation of a research program authorized by this section that will extend beyond the next reapproval date of the marketing order pursuant to Section 59086, the director shall call a public hearing pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 58771) to receive testimony regarding support for the research program by persons directly affected by the marketing order. After the hearing, the director shall find and determine, based upon the evidence received, whether or not to conduct a referendum pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 58993 prior to approval of the proposed research program in order to evaluate with greater certainty the support for the program by the persons directly affected by the marketing order.

(b) In carrying out this section, an advisory board may, subject to the approval of the director, establish a trust account to fund research programs on an ongoing basis. These programs may extend beyond the termination date of the marketing order. For any program designed to last more than one year, funding shall be provided for from the trust account during the initial year.

(c) In any research in production or processing which is carried on pursuant to this section, the Vice President for Agricultural Sciences of the University of California and the advisory board which is provided for in Article 8 (commencing with Section 58841) shall cooperate in selecting the research program which is to be carried on from time to time. Insofar as practicable, the programs shall be carried out by the University of California, but if the vice president and the advisory board determine that the university has no facilities for a particular program, or that some other research agency has better facilities for it, the program may be carried out by any other research agency which is selected by the vice president and the advisory board.

(d) In carrying out this section, an advisory board may carry out research programs for the purpose of developing and testing new products in selected markets. The proposed programs shall be submitted to the director for his or her approval prior to the expenditure of funds for the program. The proposal submitted shall include, among other things, a description of the new products, the test market to be utilized, and the duration of the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 425, Sec. 1.   Effective July 12, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

58892.1.

A marketing order may contain provisions for research studies concerning the health, food, nutritional, therapeutic, dietetic or such qualities of other food products, for the development of new food products, or for the development of new uses for agricultural products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 217.)
-------------------------------------------

58892.2.

No marketing order for milk shall be issued by the director unless he finds that such marketing order does not conflict with the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 61801) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 62700) of Part 3 of Division 21.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 217.)
-------------------------------------------

58893.

A marketing order may contain provisions which establish, or provide authority for establishing, for any commodity, either as such commodity is produced or is delivered by producers to handlers, or as handled or otherwise prepared for market, or as marketed by producers or handlers, an educational program which is designed to acquaint producers, handlers, consumers or other interested persons with quality improvement and nutritional values, including sanitation practices, procedures, or methods as applied to such commodity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 217.)
-------------------------------------------

58894.

A marketing order may contain provisions which establish, or provide authority for establishing, and for regulating the permissive use of an official board brand, trade name, or label, or other distinctive designation of grade, quality, or condition, except the grade or quality designations in effect pursuant to state or federal grade standards, for any commodity, other than wine, either as such commodity is produced or is delivered by producers to handlers, or as handled or otherwise prepared for market, or marketed by producers or handlers. As provided in Section 59236, the permissive use of any such official board brand, trade name, or label or other distinctive designation of quality shall be limited to producers and handlers of the commodity that are participating in the marketing agreement or order, and that are in compliance with its provisions and with any regulation, or rule and regulation, which is adopted under it. Any official brand or trade name which is established pursuant to this section shall not be construed as a private brand or trade name with respect to Section 58889.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58895.

A marketing order may contain provisions to detect, control, prevent damage by or to eradicate insects, predators, diseases, or parasites with respect to any commodity or group of commodities. The advisory board may recommend and the director may approve measures to assist in the prevention or reduction of losses to crops or livestock caused by predators, insects, disease or parasite infestations, including the establishment and operation of detection, inspection, spraying, dusting, fumigating or other control measures.

For the purposes of this section, (1) assessments established pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 58921) of this chapter may include an assessment for nonbearing acreage as well as bearing acreage of the commodity affected by such predators, insects, disease, or parasite, and (2) the director may use both the bearing and nonbearing acreage of such commodity as a measure of production for assent or referendum purposes in relation to such assessments.

As used in this section, “nonbearing acreage” means acreage planted to produce the particular commodity covered by the marketing order during the marketing season on which no quantity of the product is produced for marketing or is anticipated will be produced for market during such marketing season.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1059.)
-------------------------------------------

58896.

A marketing order may contain provisions for the gathering and dissemination of weather data to producers of any commodity, and to any persons providing services relating to production of a commodity, when the data is necessary to aid in any manner in the production or harvesting of that commodity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 939, Sec. 1.   Effective September 7, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

58897.

To address catastrophic events, a marketing order may contain provisions for the establishment and operation of an indemnity trust fund to cover livestock and livestock product losses due to disease, natural disaster, or accidents.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 609, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Assessments and Funds [58921. - 58941.]

58921.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 58926, each marketing order which is issued pursuant to this chapter shall provide for the levying and collection of assessments in sufficient amounts to defray the necessary expenses which are incurred by the director in the formulation, issuance, administration, and enforcement of the marketing order. If the marketing order authorizes the carrying out of advertising and sales promotion plans, it shall also provide for the levying and collection of assessments in sufficient amounts to defray the expenses of such activities. No assessment for advertising or sales promotion activities shall, however, be levied under any marketing order with respect to the marketing and handling of green ripe olives except that green ripe olives may be assessed for their proportionate share of administrative costs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58922.

Each marketing order shall indicate the maximum rate of any assessment which may be collected and the proportion, if any, of each assessment which is payable by each producer and handler that is directly regulated or affected by such marketing order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58923.

The advisory board which is appointed by the director to assist him in administering each marketing order shall recommend to the director, from time to time, budgets to cover necessary expenses, and budgets to cover the expenses of carrying out sales promotion plans if such plans are authorized in the marketing order, and the assessment rates which are necessary to provide sufficient funds. If the director finds that each such budget and assessment rate are proper and equitable and will provide sufficient moneys to defray the expenses which may be incurred, he may approve such budget and rate of assessment and order that each producer and handler so assessed shall pay to the director, at such times and in such installments as the director may prescribe, an assessment which is based upon the units in which such commodity is marketed, or upon any other uniform basis which the director determines to be reasonable and equitable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58924.

The amount of the assessment for necessary expenses shall not, however, exceed the following:

(a) In the case of producers, 212 percent of the gross dollar volume of sales of the commodity which is affected by all such producers regulated by such marketing order.

(b) In the case of processors, distributors, or other handlers, 212 percent of the gross dollar volume of purchases of the commodity which is affected by the marketing order from producers or of the gross dollar volume of sales of the commodity which is affected by the marketing order and handled by all such processors, distributors, or other handlers that are regulated by such marketing order during the marketing season during which such marketing order is effective.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58925.

Any assessment rate which is established for assessments to defray the expenses of advertising and sales promotion plans shall be in an amount which does not exceed 4 percent of the gross dollar volume of sales by all producers or by all processors, distributors, or other handlers of such commodity which is regulated by such marketing order during the marketing season during which such marketing order is effective.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58926.

In lieu of the assessments to defray the costs of formulation, issuance, administration, and enforcement and advertising or sales promotion provided for in Section 58921, if the marketing order contains provisions for advertising or sales promotion as authorized in this chapter, the director may approve and fix an assessment for producers and an assessment for handlers as the case may be, not exceeding 612 percent of the gross dollar volume of sales of such commodity by all producers, or by all processors, distributors, or other handlers of such commodity regulated by such marketing order during the marketing season during which such marketing order is effective. The method and manner of assessment and collection of such assessment, and the limitations and restrictions applicable thereupon, shall conform in all respects with the provisions of this article regarding assessments for advertising and sales promotion, except as to the maximum amount of such assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------

58927.

If the director approves and fixes a single assessment, the advisory board shall recommend and the director may approve the proportions of such assessment which may be expended to defray the costs of formulation, issuance, administration, and enforcement of the marketing order and that which may be expended for such advertising or sales promotion program. The proportion of such assessment which may be allocated in such manner to defray the cost of such administrative activities for such marketing order shall not, however, exceed the maximum amount which is authorized in Section 58924.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58928.

If any advisory board of any marketing order has reason to believe that the administration of a marketing order will be facilitated or the attainment of the purposes and objectives of the marketing order will be promoted thereby, the advisory board may borrow money with or without interest to carry out any provision of any marketing order which is authorized by this chapter, and may hypothecate anticipated assessment collections that are applicable to such respective provisions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58929.

Any assessment which is levied as provided in this article, in such specified amount as may be determined by the director pursuant to this chapter, is a personal debt of every person so assessed and shall be due and payable to the director if payment is called for by the director. If any such person fails to pay any such assessment upon the date which is determined by the director, the director may file a complaint against such person in a state court of competent jurisdiction for the collection of the assessment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58930.

If any producer or handler that is duly assessed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter fails to pay to the director the amount so assessed on or before the date which is specified by the director, the director may add to such unpaid assessment an amount not exceeding 10 percent of such unpaid assessment to defray the cost of enforcing the collection of such unpaid assessment. In addition to such payment for the cost of enforcing such collection, any such producer or handler shall pay to the director a penalty of 5 percent for each 30 days of the unpaid balance for each 30 days the assessment is unpaid, prorated over the days unpaid, commencing 30 days after notice has been given to such producer or handler of his failure to pay the assessment on the date required, unless the director determines, to his satisfaction, that such failure to pay is due to resonable cause beyond the producer’s or handler’s control. Such penalty shall not exceed 50 percent of the total amount of the assessment due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 783.)
-------------------------------------------

58931.

The director may require the persons that are assessed to deposit with him in advance the following amounts:

(a) An amount for necessary expenses.

(b) An amount which shall not exceed 25 percent of the assessment to cover the costs of advertising or sales promotion plans which are incurred prior to the receipt of sufficient funds from the assessment for such purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58932.

The amount of any deposit which is required by the director pursuant to Section 58931 shall be based upon the estimated number of units to be marketed or handled by the person that is assessed, or upon any other uniform basis which the director determines is reasonable and equitable. Such basis shall be applicable during the marketing season during which such marketing order is effective.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58933.

At any time after the funds which are credited to the administrative account, or the advertising or sales promotion account, of the marketing order are sufficient to so warrant, or at the close of the marketing season, the sums deposited by any person shall be adjusted to the amount which is properly chargeable against such person pursuant to the assessment which was authorized.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58934.

In lieu of requiring advance deposits, or in order generally to provide funds for defraying administrative or advertising and sales promotion expenses until such time as sufficient moneys are collected for such purpose from the payment of the assessments which are established pursuant to this article, the director may receive and disburse for such expense purposes contributions which are made by producers, processors, distributors, or other handlers. Neither the advisory board nor the director is responsible for the repayment of such contributions. If, however, collections from the payment of established assessments credited to the respective marketing order accounts are sufficient to so warrant, the board shall recommend and the director shall authorize, the repayment of contributions, or authorize the application of such contributions to the assessment obligations of persons that made such contributions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58934.5.

In order to provide funds for defraying expenditures authorized by the marketing order, the director or any advisory board may also receive and disburse contributions that are made by persons other than those directly affected by the marketing order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

58935.

For the convenience of making collections of any producer assessments which are established pursuant to this article, the director may collect such assessments from the handlers of the commodity which is being regulated. Any handler that pays any such assessments for and on behalf of any producer may deduct such producer assessments from any money which is owed by such handler to such producer. Any marketing order may require a handler to deduct producer assessments from any money which is owed by such handler to such producer. Such producer assessment deductions are hereby declared to be trust funds held by the handler for the purposes of the marketing order concerned and shall be remitted timely, with assessment reports, to the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------

58936.

The director may adopt rules and regulations with respect to the assessment and collection of funds pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 425, Sec. 2.   Effective July 12, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

58937.

(a) Any money that is collected by the director pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in a bank or other depository that is approved by the Director of Finance, allocated to each marketing order under which it is collected. Except as provided in Section 58941, these funds shall be disbursed by the director or the advisory board only for the necessary expenses that are incurred by the advisory board and that are approved by the director with respect to each marketing order. Allowable expenses include expenses generated by the auditing requirement imposed by subdivision (b).

Funds so collected shall be deposited and disbursed in conformity with appropriate rules and regulations that are prescribed by the director. The expenditure of these funds is exempt from the provisions of Section 925.6 of the Government Code.

(b) All such expenditures by the director shall be audited at least once every two years by one of the following means:

(1) By contract with a certified public accountant.

(2) By contract with a public accountant holding a valid permit issued by the California Board of Accountancy.

(3) By contract with a public accounting firm.

(4) By agreement with the Department of Finance.

A copy of the audit shall be delivered within 30 days after the completion of the audit to the Governor, the director, and the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1055, Sec. 18.   Effective September 30, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

58938.

The director may, at the close of each fiscal period which is used by the advisory board for budgetary purposes, refund any money which remains in such fund that is allocable to any particular commodity which is affected by a marketing order or, upon recommendation of the advisory board and with the approval of the director, all or a portion of such money may be carried over into the next succeeding fiscal period if the director finds that such money is required to defray subsequent expenses under the marketing order.

Any refund made pursuant to this section shall be on a pro rata basis made to persons from whom, or on whose behalf, the assessments being refunded were collected. Upon termination by the director of any marketing order, any remaining balances which are not required by the director to defray the expenses of such marketing order, shall be returned by the director upon a pro rata basis, to all persons from whom, or on whose behalf, such assessments were collected unless the director finds that the amounts so returnable are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of such pro rata refund to such persons. If the director makes such a finding, he may use the moneys in such fund to defray the expenses which are incurred by him in the formulation, issuance, administration, or enforcement of any subsequent marketing order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1059.)
-------------------------------------------

58938.5.

(a) Assessments paid on milk pursuant to the requirements of a market milk marketing order or a manufacturing milk marketing order established under this chapter shall be refunded to producers who meet the following criteria:

(1) The producer shipped milk to a processor during the months of June or July 1986.

(2) The producer was not paid, or received only partial payment, for the milk shipped.

(3) The producer has agreed to repay the refunded assessments to the affected programs if, at a subsequent date, the producer is paid for the milk.

(b) The producer shall receive a full refund of the amount assessed for milk shipped and for which no payment was received. If partial payment was received, the producer shall receive a refund of assessments paid on milk for which payment was not received.

(c) In lieu of payment to the producer, the refund shall be paid to an entity which markets milk or otherwise acts on behalf of a producer who would otherwise qualify for the refund under subdivision (a), if that entity demonstrates to the satisfaction of the director that it paid the assessments for the producer.

(d) If a producer, or an entity referred to in subdivision (c), subsequently receives full or partial payment for milk for which assessments have been refunded, the producer or entity, as the case may be, shall repay the assessments in an amount proportionate to the portion of milk for which payment has been received.

(e) Refunds shall not be made pursuant to this section if the refund would cause a producer to incur an additional assessment obligation to the National Milk Promotion Program.

(f) The director shall adopt procedures for refunding assessments in accordance with this section. The procedures shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1048, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

58939.

Any money which is deposited pursuant to this article, which the director determines is available for investment, may be invested or reinvested by the Treasurer or an advisory board in any of the securities which are described in Article 1 (commencing with Section 16430) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, or placed in a depository as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16500) of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and handled in the same manner as money in the State Treasury.

Any increment which is received from the investment or reinvestment or deposit, if made by the Treasurer, shall be remitted to the advisory board whose funds were invested, reinvested, or deposited, and shall be deposited and disbursed as provided in Sections 58937 and 58938. The Treasurer may deduct from the remittance an amount equal to the reasonable costs incurred in carrying out this section or may bill the advisory board for the costs, and the advisory board shall pay the costs from money which is collected for it pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 417, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

58940.

Any check or warrant which is drawn against the funds of any marketing order which remains unclaimed or uncashed for a period of six months from the date of issuance shall be canceled and the money retained for disbursement to the original payee or claimant upon satisfactory identification for a period of one year from the time the check or warrant is canceled. The money so retained, if not claimed within the period of one year, shall be credited to the then currently operating marketing order for the commodity under which the funds so retained were collected. If there is no marketing order then in effective operation for the commodity, the funds shall be credited to the unexpended balance, if any, of the last previous marketing order for the commodity. If there is no marketing order then in current operation, or no balance exists from any previous marketing order to which the funds may be credited, the funds so retained may be expended by the director for the benefit of any marketing order established under the provision of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1059.)
-------------------------------------------

58941.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 241), Chapter 2, Division 1 of this code, each marketing order or agreement shall be charged the amounts which are computed by the director as required to reasonably provide for services to be rendered to such marketing orders by the department. Such amounts are subject to approval by the advisory board which is concerned, shall be included in each budget which is recommended to and approved by the director pursuant to Sections 58923 and 58924, and shall be withdrawn as required by the director and expended only for the necessary expenses which are incurred by the director in the administration of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Deposits by Applicants for Marketing Order [58961. - 58962.]

58961.

Prior to the issuance of any marketing order by the director pursuant to this chapter, the director may require the applicants for the issuance of the marketing order to deposit with him such amount as he may deem necessary to defray the expenses of preparing and making effective such marketing order. Such funds shall be received, deposited, and disbursed by the director in accordance with the provisions which are set forth in Article 10 (commencing with Section 58921) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58962.

The director may reimburse the applicant, from any funds for necessary expenses which he has received pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 58921) of this chapter, for any of the following:

(a) Any amount deposited with the director by applicant pursuant to Section 58961.

(b) For any necessary expenses which are incurred by the applicant in preparing and in obtaining approval of the marketing order, upon receipt of a verified statement of such expenses which is approved by the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Assent to Marketing Orders [58991. - 59000.]

58991.

A marketing order or major amendment to it, which directly affects handlers, that is issued pursuant to this chapter, shall not become effective unless and until the director finds one of the following has occurred:

(a) It has been assented to in writing by not less than 65 percent of the handlers that are engaged, within the area specified in the marketing order or amendment to it, in the handling of the commodity which is regulated by the marketing order.

(b) It has been assented to in writing by handlers that handle not less than 65 percent of the volume of the commodity which is regulated by the marketing order.
